Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB381.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 121.2. Keystone Exam Alternative Feasibility Study.--(a) The secretary shall contract for an independent study to determine whether the ACT and SAT may be administered in lieu of the current Statewide, standardized Keystone Exams in literature, algebra I and biology for high school students consistent with Federal requirements under 20 U.S.C. § 6311(b)(2)(H) (relating to state plans).(b) The secretary shall submit, within one year after the effective date of this subsection, a report containing the 1234567891011121314151617181920 results of the study and recommendations to the Governor, the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Education Committee of the Senate and the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Education Committee of the House of Representatives. The study shall include the following:(1) An evaluation of the degree to which the ACT and SAT align with Pennsylvania core academic standards and are suitable for use in lieu of the Statewide Keystone Exams in literature, algebra I and biology.(2) Studies, research and analyses required to determine the extent to which the ACT and SAT test results provide comparable, valid and reliable data on student achievement as compared to the Keystone Exams for all students and for each subgroup of students.(3) A determination of whether the ACT and SAT provide testing accommodations that permit students with disabilities and English learners the opportunity to participate in each assessment and receive comparable benefits.(4) Analyses to determine whether the ACT and SAT provide unbiased, rational and consistent differentiation among schools within the Commonwealth's accountability system.(5) An evaluation to determine whether the ACT and SAT meet the criteria for technical quality that all Statewide assessments must meet for Federal assessment peer review.(c) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"ACT." A standardized test for the assessment of college readiness administered by ACT."Keystone Exam." An assessment developed or caused to be 20250HB0381PN0346 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 developed by the Department of Education under 22 Pa. Code § 4.51b(a) (relating to Keystone Exams)."SAT." A standardized test for the assessment of college readiness administered by the College Board."Secretary." The Secretary of Education of the Commonwealth.Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB0381PN0346 - 3 - 123456